Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202680-416
Adoption of pet animal; financial support for veterans; program; administration.

The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall create a program for the purpose of providing financial support to veterans for the costs associated with adopting a pet animal. The department shall use the money credited to the Pets for Vets Cash Fund under section 60-3,163.02 to award grants to carry out the purposes of such program. The department may administer the program or contract with an organization dedicated to the care of dogs and cats to administer the program.

Laws 2020, LB944, § 88;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 65.